Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.060

Kinds of execution.

There shall be three kinds of executions: First, against the property of the judgment debtor; second, for the delivery of the possession of real or personal property or such delivery with damages for withholding the same; and third, commanding the enforcement of or obedience to any other order of the court. In all cases there shall be an order to collect the costs.

[ 1987 c 442 s 406; 1929 c 25 s 3; RRS s 511. Prior: Code 1881 s 327; 1877 p 68 s 331; 1854 p 176 s 244. Formerly RCW 6.04.020.]